Massachusetts, session 194th, S1968.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is 
hereby amended in the third paragraph by inserting after the word “purposes”, in line 21, by 
inserting the following words:- “and the business has 30 or more employees”.